Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 307.520 is amended to read:
307.520. (1) Property or a portion of property owned by a limited equity cooperative is  exempt
from taxation as provided under ORS 307.515 to 307.523 if:
(a) The property is occupied by low income persons holding  a proprietary lease in the limited
equity cooperative;
(b) The charges paid by the occupant to the limited equity cooperative  for occupancy reflect the
full value of the property tax exemption;
(c) The exemption has been approved  as provided in ORS 307.523, pursuant to an application
filed before July 1, 2030;  and
[(d) The housing units on the property were constructed, or converted  to limited equity cooperative
ownership, after the local governing body adopted the provisions of ORS 307.515 to 307.523; and ]
[(e)] (d) The information disclosed on the application filed  pursuant to ORS 307.521 meets any
other criteria adopted by the governing body.
(2) A governing body that adopts the provisions of  ORS 307.515 to 307.523 may adopt additional
criteria for exemption that  do not conflict with the criteria described in subsection (1)(a) to [ (d)] (c)
of this section.
SECTION 2. The amendments to ORS 307.520 by section 1 of  this 2025 Act apply to claims
for exemption under ORS 307.520 for property tax years beginning on or after July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 3232 (HB 3232-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by House April 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 21, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3232 (HB 3232-INTRO) Page 2